Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 33

State Technology Council

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

25-33-101. State Technology Council.

There is created the State Technology Council to consist of the following members:

The Director of the Division of Information Systems or his or her designee who shall act as chair of the council;

The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services or his or her designee;

The council shall be responsible for developing:

The information technology standards and specifications for state agencies;

A state information technology plan that shall establish state-level mission, goals, and objectives for the use of information technology; and

Technical standards and specifications to support the state's shared enterprise architecture.

The council may meet as deemed necessary by the chair of the council.

A quorum of the council shall consist of three (3) members.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1042, § 1; 2007, No. 751, § 26; 2019, No. 910, § 6320.

25-33-102 — 25-33-107. [Repealed.]

25-33-201 — 25-33-205. [Repealed.]

The Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality is directed to study the current and future solutions for long term disposal options for the entire state to include: (1) Parts Harvesting; (2) Reuse; (3) Donation; (4) Demanufacturing; and (5) New and emerging technology solutions.

25-34-101. Title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas Computer and Electronic Solid Waste Management Act”.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1410, § 1.

25-34-102. Findings and purpose.

The General Assembly finds that:

Computer and electronic solid waste is among the fastest growing and most toxic segments of Arkansas' solid waste stream;

The state must frequently upgrade and replace computers, telecommunications devices, and other technologically sophisticated equipment necessary to the efficient operation of state government.

The necessary purchase of up-to-date computers, telecommunications devices, and other technological equipment for state government use often results in a surplus of existing equipment that, while unfit for state government purposes, is still useful and marketable for less complex and less high-speed dependent use.

Surplus equipment is generally stored by the owner agency until the equipment is cleared of all government software and files.

By the time surplus computer equipment is delivered to the Marketing and Redistribution Section of the Office of State Procurement of the Department of Finance and Administration, it is generally technologically obsolete and has lost considerable value, resulting in a significant waste of potential revenue to the State of Arkansas;

Computers and electronic equipment not sold by the Marketing and Redistribution Section may be disposed of in state landfill space until January 1, 2008; and

There are disposal and recycling options other than landfill disposal to address this problem, including:

Parts harvesting;

Reuse;

Resale;

Donation; and

Demanufacturing.

This chapter is intended to:

Achieve the maximum possible benefit from use of state agency-owned computers, electronics, and peripherals;

Achieve maximum benefit from sale of surplus state agency assets; and

Protect the public health, safety, and the environment by mandating that steps be taken to address the solid waste management of computers and other electronic solid waste statewide.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1410, § 2; 2005, No. 970, § 1.

25-34-103. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Agency” means every department, division, office, board, commission, and institution of this state, including state-supported institutions of higher education;

“Computer” means a programmable electronic machine that performs high-speed mathematical or logical operations or that assembles, stores, correlates, or otherwise processes information;

“Consumer electronic item” means a personal computer, computer component, audio player, stereo player, videocassette player, facsimile machine, copy machine, cellular telephone, wireless paging device, video game console, or any electronic item containing an intact or broken cathode ray tube.

An electronic item containing a cathode ray tube includes a television, computer monitor, or any other cathode ray tube monitor or display device;

“Degauss” means the complete removal of information from the hard drive of a computer;

“Demanufacturing” means end-of-life disposition of electronic devices and computers.

“Demanufacturing” includes recovery of hard drives and chips with resale value, the removal of commodities such as copper, aluminum, and gold for sale to scrap consumers, the removal and hazardous-waste disposal of toxins and heavy metals, and the shredding or melting of materials that can be sold and manufactured into new products;

“Disposal” means the discharge, deposit, injection, spilling, leaking, placing, or dumping of any computer or electronic waste into or on any land or water in whatever manner so that the waste or any constituent thereof might enter the environment or be emitted into the air or be discharged into the waters of the state, including groundwaters;

“Electronics” means devices utilizing electrons and electric circuits, including household appliances, televisions, recording and playing devices for music or video tapes, compact discs, and digital technology;

“Fugitive amounts of consumer electronic items” means small quantities that escape the approved methods of usage, reduction, reuse, or recycling;

“Fund” means the Computer and Electronic Recycling Fund established by this chapter;

“Recycle” means the use of previously manufactured materials including metals, glass, and plastics in the manufacture of new products;

“Reuse” means use of electronics, computers, and equipment for harvesting of spare parts, resale, or donation; and

“Surplus computer equipment” means computer components no longer in use in an agency and which have residual market value.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1410, § 3; 2005, No. 970, § 2.

25-34-104. Agency policy.

Each agency shall prepare and implement an agency-wide policy for the management and sale of agency surplus computer equipment and electronics in accord with the Director of the Division of Information Systems policies for review and replacement of computer and electronic equipment.

The policy shall mandate that all hard drives of surplus computer equipment be degaussed, cleared of all data and software, and be otherwise prepared for sale within ninety (90) days after replacement.

The policy may provide that computers and electronic equipment first be offered for sale to agency personnel after degaussing of the hard drive.

The policy shall allow each agency to keep a back stock of computer hardware and electronics for the purpose of parts harvesting for the repair, maintenance, and upgrade of computers in use.

Back stock shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the number of state employee computers in the agency.

The policy shall include a provision that state employees purchasing state agency computers and electronic equipment accept the computer or equipment on an “as-is” basis, without any warranty of any kind by the agency.

The policy shall be presented to the director and the Legislative Council for review.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Information Systems” for “Director of the Department of Information Systems” in (a)(1) and (b); and deleted “Within sixty (60) days after August 12, 2005” from the beginning of (b).

Unsold surplus computer equipment may be sent to the Marketing and Redistribution Section of the Office of State Procurement of the Department of Finance and Administration for sale, auction, recycling, donation, demanufacturing, or disposal.

Alternatively, the agency may maintain possession of computers and electronics and allow the Marketing and Redistribution Section to sell or auction the computer or electronic equipment via an Internet website.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1410, § 4; 2005, No. 970, § 3; 2019, No. 910, §§ 6321, 6322.

25-34-105. Agency authority and accounting.

Each agency shall apply the administrative procedures of the Marketing and Redistribution Section of the Office of State Procurement of the Department of Finance and Administration to the sale.

Within sixty (60) days after August 13, 2001, each agency shall prepare a plan to account for the sale of used equipment and present that plan for review to the Department of Finance and Administration, the Executive Chief Information Officer, and the Legislative Council.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1410, § 5.

25-34-106. Sale of surplus computer equipment and electronics.

If an agency policy established under §25-34-104 provides for the preferential sale of surplus computer and electronic equipment to agency employees, that computer and electronic equipment shall be sold at a price determined by the Department of Finance and Administration.

If an agency policy established under §25-34-104 provides for the preferential sale of surplus computer and electronic equipment to Arkansas public schools or local governments, that computer and electronic equipment shall be sold at a price determined by the Department of Finance and Administration.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1410, § 6; 2005, No. 970, § 4.

25-34-107. Surplus equipment not sold.

(1)Unsold surplus computer and electronic equipment may be donated by the owning agency to Arkansas public schools or local governments if the agency policy so provides.

Arkansas public schools and local governments are not required but may choose to accept unsold surplus computer and electronic equipment donated by the owning agency.

(1)Unsold surplus computer and electronic equipment may be donated by the owning agency to law enforcement agencies if the agency policy so provides.

Law enforcement agencies are not required but may choose to accept unsold surplus computer and electronic equipment donated by the owning agency.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1410, § 7; 2003, No. 1028, § 1; 2005, No. 970, § 5.

25-34-108. Disbursement of revenues.

Funds generated from the sale of agency surplus computer and electronic equipment to state employees, public schools, or by other sale shall be allocated as follows:

If the sale of surplus computer or electronic equipment is made within the agency:

Sixty percent (60%) of the proceeds shall be returned to the owning agency;

Fifteen percent (15%) of the proceeds shall be deposited with the Marketing and Redistribution Section of the Office of State Procurement of the Department of Finance and Administration; and

Twenty-five percent (25%) of the proceeds shall be deposited in the Computer and Electronic Recycling Fund established by this chapter;

If the sale of surplus computer or electronic equipment is outside the agency and conducted by the Marketing and Redistribution Section:

Fifty percent (50%) of the proceeds shall be returned to the owning agency;

Twenty-five percent (25%) of the proceeds shall be deposited with the Marketing and Redistribution Section; and

Twenty-five percent (25%) of the proceeds shall be deposited in the Computer and Electronic Recycling Fund established by this chapter and § 19-5-1217.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1410, § 8.

25-34-109. Computer and Electronic Recycling Fund.

There is established on the books of the Treasurer of State, Auditor of State, and Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be known as the “Computer and Electronic Recycling Fund”.

The fund shall be administered by the Division of Environmental Quality and may be used to:

Promote market research and development grants to determine the most efficient means of collecting, transporting, and processing scrap electronic equipment;

Work with the Department of Finance and Administration and the Marketing and Redistribution Section to establish statewide contracts for computer and electronics recycling and demanufacturing businesses; and

Support and fund other measures necessary to implement and promote the recycling, donation, demanufacturing, or disposal options for computers and electronic equipment.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2001, No. 1410, § 9, is also codified as §19-5-1217.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b).

Return of investment analysis; and

Available funds.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a).

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1410, § 9; 2019, No. 910, § 3251.

25-34-110. Computer and electronic equipment recycling grants.

Electronic equipment recycling grants must be awarded on the basis of written grant-request proposals submitted to and approved by the Division of Environmental Quality.

Grant requests shall be considered based upon the following criteria:

The development of sustained processes for recovery, recycling, and demanufacturing of scrap computers and electronics;

Minimization and elimination of substantial volumes of this material as waste;

Creation of Arkansas jobs;

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1410, § 10; 2019, No. 910, § 3252.

25-34-111. Computer and electronic equipment landfill ban.

Effective January 1, 2010, the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission may establish and implement rules banning the disposal of all computer and electronic equipment in Arkansas landfills.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1410, § 12; 2005, No. 970, § 6; 2007, No. 512, § 3.

Subchapter 2

— Arkansas Technology Infrastructure Fund